nb: Hi-hat-sammenkoblet type: Kun bunncymbal; Matchet par (topp og bunn); Kun toppcymbal; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de par de chimbal: Apenas prato inferior; Par combinado (superior e inferior); Apenas prato superior; Outros
el: Τύπος ζεύγους Hi-hat: Μόνο κάτω πιατίνι; Σετ (επάνω και κάτω); Μόνο επάνω πιατίνι; Άλλο
cs: Typ hi-hatu z hlediska párování: Pouze spodní činel; Sladěný pár (horní a spodní); Pouze horní činel; Jiné
ru: Тип пары хай-хэтов: Только нижняя тарелка; Подобранная пара (верхняя и нижняя); Только верхняя тарелка; Другое
de: Typ des Hi-Hat-Paars: Nur unteres Becken; Abgestimmtes Paar (oben & unten); Nur oberes Becken; Andere
sk-SK: Typ páru činelov hi-hat: Len spodný činel; Zladený pár (vrchný a spodný); Len vrchný činel; Iné
ja: ハイハットペアタイプ: ボトムシンバルのみ; マッチドペア (トップ・ボトム); トップシンバルのみ; その他
ko: 하이햇 페어 타입: 바텀 심벌 전용; 매치드 페어(탑 & 바텀); 탑 심벌 전용; 기타
th: รูปแบบการจับคู่ฉาบไฮแฮท: ฉาบล่างเท่านั้น; เข้าคู่ (บนและล่าง); ฉาบบนเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de par de platillos hi-hat: Solo platillo inferior; Par a juego (superior e inferior); Solo platillo superior; Otro
hu: Hi-hat pár típusa: Csak alsó cintányér; Összeillő pár (felső és alsó); Csak felső cintányér; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta para hi-hat: Samo donja činela; Usklađeni par (gornja i donja); Samo gornja činela; Ostalo
tr: Hi-hat zil çifti türü: Sadece alt zil; Eşleştirilmiş çift (üst ve alt); Sadece üst zil; Diğer
fr: Type de paire de charleston: Cymbale inférieure uniquement; Paire assortie (supérieure et inférieure); Cymbale supérieure uniquement; Autre
bg-BG: Тип чифт hi-hat чинели: Само долен чинел; Съвпадаща двойка (горен и долен); Само горен чинел; Други
sl-SI: Vrsta para činel hi-hat: Samo spodnja činela; Usklajen par (zgornja in spodnja); Samo zgornja činela; Drugo
fi: Jalkalautasparin tyyppi: Vain alasymbaali; Yhteensopiva pari (ylä- ja alasymbaali); Vain yläsymbaali; Muu
zh-CN: 踩镲配对类型: 仅底镲; 配对（顶镲和底镲）; 仅顶镲; 其他
sv: Typ av hihat-par: Endast undercymbal; Matchat par (över- och underdel); Endast övercymbal; Annat
vi: Loại cặp hi-hat: Chỉ cymbal dưới; Cặp khớp (trên và dưới); Chỉ cymbal trên; Khác
zh-TW: Hi-hat 鈸組類型: 僅含下鈸; 配對組合 (上鈸和下鈸); 僅含上鈸; 其他
da: Type af hi-hat-sæt: Kun bundbækken; Matchende par (top og bund); Kun topbækken; Andet
it: Tipo di piatti charleston: Solo piatto inferiore; Coppia abbinata (piatto superiore e inferiore); Solo piatto superiore; Altro
pl: Typ pary hi-hat: Tylko dolny talerz (bottom); Dopasowana para (góra i dół); Tylko górny talerz (top); Inny
ro-RO: Tipul setului de hi-hat: Doar cinel inferior; Pereche potrivită (superior și inferior); Doar cinel superior; Altele
nl: Hi-hat paar type: Alleen onderste bekken; Bij elkaar passend paar (boven & onder); Alleen bovenste bekken; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de hi-hat parar: Apenas prato inferior; Par combinado (superior e inferior); Apenas prato superior; Outro
lt-LT: Hi-hat poros tipas: Tik apatinė lėkštė; Suderinta pora (viršutinė ir apatinė); Tik viršutinė lėkštė; Kita
en: Hi-hat pair type: Bottom cymbal only; Matched pair (top & bottom); Top cymbal only; Other